Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1132.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sgt. John J. Bonk, Jr., Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) John J. Bonk, Jr., attended Bensalem High School and graduated in 1978.(2) He enlisted in the Marine Corps after graduation.(3) Sgt. Bonk was among the more than 230 United States servicemen killed in the bombing of the Marine barracks at Beirut International Airport, Lebanon, on October 23, 1983, resulting in the largest single-day loss of American servicemen since the Vietnam War.(4) Sgt. Bonk was laid to rest at Resurrection Cemetery in Bucks County, with full honors.(5) Bensalem High School presents the "Sergeant John 12345678910111213141516171819 Bonk Gung-Ho Award" to Junior ROTC cadets who have shown the most leadership by example, and the award is voted on by other JROTC cadets.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 46384, carrying Galloway Road over Interstate 276 in Bensalem Township, Bucks County, is designated the Sgt. John J. Bonk, Jr., Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1132PN1381 - 2 - 123456789101112